Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Arson and Related Offenses

Cross references. —

As to murder during the commission of arson, see §

6-2-101

.

As to the state fire marshal investigating the origin and circumstances of fires and arresting the suspected incendiary, see §§

35-9-109

and

35-9-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “burning” to justify charge of arson, 28 ALR4th 482.

Pyromania and the criminal law, 51 ALR4th 1243.

§ 6-3-101.
Arson; first degree; aggravated arson; penalties.

A person is guilty of first-degree arson if he maliciously starts a fire or causes an explosion with intent to destroy or damage an occupied structure.

First-degree arson is a felony punishable by:

Imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years;

A fine of not more than the greater of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) or two (2) times the face amount of the insurance if the fire was started to cause collection of insurance for the loss; or

Both fine and imprisonment.

A person is guilty of aggravated arson if he maliciously starts a fire or causes an explosion with intent to destroy an occupied structure, under circumstances evidencing reckless disregard for human life, and serious bodily injury or death occurs to another person, either at the scene or while in emergency response to the incident.

Aggravated arson is a felony punishable by:

Imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) years;

A fine of not more than the greater of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) or two (2) times the face amount of the insurance if the fire was started to cause collection of insurance for the loss; or

Both fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1993, ch. 166, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “occupied structure,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to prohibition against overinsurance, see §

26-23-101

.

As to insurance adjuster investigating the cause of fires and reporting same to the insurance commissioner, see §

26-23-102

.

Specific intent. —

District court
properly convicted defendant of first-degree arson because, while
he claimed that his intoxication excused his actions, he intentionally
set fire in a store while it was occupied by customers and employees,
he admitted to police that he started the fire because he was angry
about the store's customer service, he had to make decisions and take
actions that required some presence of mind, witnesses who spoke to
him stated that he spoke clearly before and after he started the fire,
he told his mother to say he was drunk when he started the fire, and
the State presented evidence that he was not intoxicated to a level
that prevented him from knowing what he was doing. Harnden v. State, 2016 WY 92, 378 P.3d 611,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2016).

First-degree arson was not specific intent crime prior to revision of Criminal Code,

effective July 1, 1983. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983).

Malice does not have to be directed toward another. —

In a prosecution for first-degree arson, where defendant threw his roommate out and threatened to set his mobile home on fire, the trial court did not err in refusing defendant's proposed jury instruction defining the term “maliciously” because to prove arson the State did not have to prove that the malicious act was directed toward another; the fact that defendant might not have felt actual hostility toward his roommate or toward the police did not mean that he was not guilty of arson because defendant's actions placed them all in great danger and his conduct was without legal justification or excuse. Keats v. State, 2003 WY 19, 64 P.3d 104,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2003).

“Occupied structure” can be vacant. —

A structure “in which a person may reasonably be expected to be present” (see § 6-1-104(a)(v)(D)) is one that is intended to be “occupied”, as stated in subsection (a) of this section, and would be perceived by any reasonable person to be an occupied structure, although unoccupied at the time. Barnes v. State, 858 P.2d 522,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1993).

Officials need no warrant to remain in building for reasonable time to investigate cause of blaze

after it has been extinguished. And if the warrantless entry to put out the fire and determine its cause is constitutional, the warrantless seizure of evidence while inspecting the premises for these purposes also is constitutional. Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984); Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985); Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004).

Stated

in

Chorniak v. State, 715 P.2d 1162,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 510

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004); Szymanski v. State, 2007 WY 139, 166 P.3d 879,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Aug. 29, 2007).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases. State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vacancy or nonoccupancy of building as affecting its character as “dwelling” as regards arson, 44 ALR2d 1456.

Burning of building by mortgagor as burning property of another so as to constitute arson, 76 ALR2d 524.

Admissibility of evidence of other fires, 87 ALR2d 891.

§ 6-3-102.
Arson; second degree; penalties.

A person is guilty of second-degree arson if he starts a fire or causes an explosion with intent to destroy or damage any property to cause collection of insurance for the loss.

Second-degree arson is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than two (2) times the face amount of the insurance, or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Circumstantial evidence usual and sufficient. —

It is not unusual for all the evidence against an accused to be circumstantial and sufficient to sustain a finding of guilty because the very nature of the crime of arson ordinarily dictates that the evidence will be circumstantial. Vialpando v. State, 494 P.2d 939,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1972).

Elements of offense. —

Origin of
a fire is not a “necessary fact” because it is not
one
of the elements of the crime of second degree arson. Thus, in
a second
degree arson case, the State was not required to prove where
the fire
started. Montee v. State, 2013 WY 74, 303 P.3d 362,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2013).

Intent. —

In a case
in which defendant was convicted of second degree arson, the evidence
was sufficient to allow a jury to determine beyond a reasonable doubt
that defendant started the fire with intent to destroy or damage
the
home to cause collection of insurance for the loss. Montee v. State, 2013 WY 74, 303 P.3d 362,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Wilcox v. State, 670 P.2d 1116,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 374

(Wyo. 1983); Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases. State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

§ 6-3-103.
Arson; third degree; penalties.

A person is guilty of third-degree arson if he intentionally starts a fire or causes an explosion and intentionally, recklessly or with criminal negligence:

Places another in danger of bodily injury; or

Destroys or damages any property of another which has a value of two hundred dollars ($200.00) or more.

Third-degree arson is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

For purposes of this article, “property of another” means a building, or other property, whether real or personal, in which any person or entity other than the offender has an interest, including an insurance or mortgage interest, which the offender has no authority to defeat or impair, even though the offender may also have an interest in the building or property.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1993, ch. 166, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “criminal negligence,” see §

6-1-104

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-104.
Arson; fourth degree; penalties.

A person is guilty of fourth-degree arson if he intentionally starts a fire or causes an explosion and intentionally, recklessly or with criminal negligence destroys or damages any property of another as defined in W.S. 6-3-103(c) which has a value of less than two hundred dollars ($200.00).

Fourth-degree arson is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1993, ch. 166, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “criminal negligence,” see §

6-1-104

.

Quoted

in

KAA v. State, 2001 WY 24, 18 P.3d 1159,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-3-105.
Negligently burning grounds; penalties.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he, without permission of the owner and acting with criminal negligence:

Sets fire to any grounds or to anything on any grounds which is the property of another; or

Allows a fire to pass from the owner’s property or grounds to the injury or destruction of any property of another.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2015 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

For definition of “criminal negligence,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to duty of the state forester to extinguish forest and range fires, see §

36-2-108

.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(i), deleted “woods, prairie or” preceding “grounds”; and in (a)(ii), substituted “property” for “woods.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 18.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of one negligently causing fire for injuries sustained by person other than firefighter, 91 ALR3d 1202.

§ 6-3-106.
Failure to extinguish or contain fire outside; penalty.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) if he, outside of normal agronomic or forestry practices, lights a fire outdoors and leaves the vicinity of the fire without extinguishing it or containing it so it does not spread or conditions are such that the fire is not reasonably likely to spread.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2015 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($ 750.00) if he lights a fire in any woods or on any prairie and leaves the vicinity of the fire without extinguishing it or containing it so it does not spread and is not likely to spread.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 18.

§ 6-3-107.
Throwing burning substance from vehicle; penalties.

A person who throws a burning substance from a vehicle is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-108.
Definitions for W.S. 6-3-108 through 6-3-110.

As used in W.S.

6-3-108

through

6-3-110

:

“Authorized agency” means any of the following agencies or officials when authorized or required to investigate or prosecute alleged arson:

The state fire marshal or his designee;

A county and prosecuting or district attorney;

The attorney general or his designee;

A fire department;

A county sheriff’s department, the Wyoming state highway patrol or municipal police department;

The federal bureau of investigation or any other federal agency;

The United States attorney’s office; and

The state insurance commissioner or his designee.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1999, ch. 29, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to attorney general, see §

9-1-601

.

As to insurance commissioner, see §

26-2-102

.

As to state fire marshal, see §

35-9-104

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-109.
Information provided by insurers; notice of nonaccidental fires; release of information; immunity.

Upon receipt of a written request from an authorized agency, an insurance company shall release to the authorized agency all information requested by the agency relating to a fire loss. The information may include:

The application for the policy;

Insurance policy information relevant to the insured;

Policy premium payment records;

The insured’s history of claims; and

Material from an investigation of the loss, including statements, proof of loss and other relevant information.

An insurance company which has reason to believe a fire loss was caused by other than accident shall notify an authorized agency in writing and upon request shall provide all information developed in the company’s inquiry into the fire loss. Notice to any authorized agency is sufficient notice under W.S.

6-3-108

through

6-3-110

.

Upon request, an authorized agency may release to any other authorized agency information obtained pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

An insurance company which provided information to an authorized agency pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section may request relevant information from an authorized agency. Within a reasonable time, the authorized agency may provide the requested information.

Any insurance company or person acting in its behalf or authorized agency who releases information, whether oral or written, is immune from any liability arising out of a civil action or any penalty resulting from a criminal prosecution which occurs incident to the release of the information unless willful misstatement, attempted duress or malice is shown.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Immunity from civil rights actions. —

An insurer's supplying of information under this section concerning suspected arson to state authorities, standing alone, does not invest it with the requisite color of state law for purposes of civil rights actions under 42 USCS § 1983 since such behavior does not suggest any joint action with the state. Hatch v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Co., 842 P.2d 1089,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-110.
Information to be held in confidence.

An authorized agency or insurance company which receives information pursuant to W.S.

6-3-108

through

6-3-110

shall hold the information in confidence except when release is authorized by the source of the information, by W.S.

6-3-108

through

6-3-110

or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Applied

in

Hatch v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co., 930 P.2d 382,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-111.
Possession, manufacture, transportation and sale of explosives, improvised explosive device, or incendiary apparatus with unlawful intent prohibited; penalties; definition; exception.

As used in this section:

“Explosive” means any chemical or mechanical compound, substance or mixture that is commonly used or intended to cause an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities or packing that an ignition by fire, friction, concussion, percussion or by detonation of any part of the compound or mixture is likely to cause such a sudden generation of heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on nearby objects, or of destroying life or limb;

“Improvised explosive device” means any device, not commercially manufactured in the ordinary course of interstate commerce, which contains explosives as defined by paragraph (i) of this subsection;

“Incendiary apparatus” means any fuse, accelerant, time delay ignition apparatus, mechanism, device or material or combination of materials designed, devised or reasonably calculated to cause, spread or accelerate the rate of burning of a fire, or to cause additional damage at or by a fire, or to cause an explosion in connection with a fire;

The terms “explosive,” “improvised explosive device” and “incendiary apparatus” shall be construed to include and refer to any explosive, incendiary, bomb, grenade, rocket having a propellant charge of more than four (4) ounces, missile having an explosive or incendiary charge of more than one-quarter (1/4) ounce, mine or similar device containing or represented to contain any poison gas, nerve gas, biological agent or other chemical or substance capable of causing death or serious physical injury.

Any person who possesses, manufactures, transports, sells or delivers to another person any explosive, improvised explosive device, or incendiary apparatus, with the intent unlawfully to endanger the life or physical well being of another, to commit assault or battery or to inflict bodily harm or injury upon the person of another, or with the intent to assist another person to do the same, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Any person who possesses, manufactures, transports, sells or delivers to another person any explosive, improvised explosive device, or incendiary apparatus, with the intent to cause injury or damage to the property of another as defined in W.S. 6-3-103(c), or with the intent to assist another person to do the same, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

A person is guilty of intimidation by explosive device if he knowingly, and with the intent to threaten, intimidate or terrorize another person, uses any object or material and represents it to be an explosive, improvised explosive device or incendiary apparatus, and thereby places another person in reasonable fear of imminent physical harm. Upon conviction he shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to apply to any law enforcement officer if performed in the lawful performance of his official duties, nor to any person customarily engaged in the lawful business of manufacture, transportation, sale or use of such materials and devices, if performed in the ordinary course of business and without the criminal intent described in this section, nor to any person actually and lawfully engaged in demolition activity on a ranch, farm or construction site with the authority of the owner thereof, and acting without the criminal intent described in this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 166, § 1.

Evidence sufficient. —

Sufficient evidence was presented on each of the elements concerning the charge of possessing explosives with the intent to endanger another and to find that the blasting caps found in defendant's residence were explosives; defendant was identified as a certified blaster who was responsible for reviewing and keeping inventory of the explosives at his jobsite, defendant was without permission to remove any such explosive materials from the site, and a bomb squad officer testified and identified these blasting caps as being very effective and of high-grade quality. Manes v. State, 2004 WY 33, 86 P.3d 1274,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-3-112.
Preventing or obstructing extinguishment of fire; interference with firefighter; penalties.

A person who willfully injures, destroys, removes or in any manner interferes with the use of any vehicle, tools, equipment, water supplies, hydrants, towers, buildings, communications facilities, or other instruments or facilities used in the detection, reporting, suppression or extinguishing of fire is guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

A person who willfully and unreasonably hinders or interferes with a firefighter in the performance of his official duties, or attempts to do so with the intention of interfering with the firefighting effort, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 166, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).